Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6128XS (4) 91 da/js S.F. 2261 Section 1. Section 459.311, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. a. The department may require that the owner of a 3 confinement feeding operation to install and operate a water 4 pollution monitoring system as part of an unformed manure 5 storage structure. 6 b. The owner or operator of a confinement feeding operation, 7 other than a small animal feeding operation, shall install and 8 operate a water pollution monitoring system as part of the 9 confinement feeding operation. The monitoring system shall 10 collect and record data regarding the type and quantity of 11 pollutant originating from a confinement feeding operation that 12 is discharged to the groundwater or a surface water source. 13 The owner or operator of the confinement feeding operation 14 shall report the data to the department every ninety days. The 15 department shall publish the data on its internet site, and 16 regularly report such data to the United States environmental 17 protection agency office of enforcement compliance assurance, 18 which may be part of any compliance information system 19 administered by the United States environmental protection 20 agency. 21